Louisiana, session 2026, HB605.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 23:1105 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1105. Employer experience modifiers; accidents caused by third parties
A. If an insurer is due reimbursement from a third party for compensation
and medical benefits paid as a result of an accident and the insurer has acted, as
provided for in this Subpart, to recover the reimbursement from the third party,
notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary, the insurer shall not factor the
accident into the calculation of the employer's experience modifier until the parties
reach an agreement or a final judgment is rendered. At such time, the insurer may
recalculate the employer's experience modifier based on the allocation of fault and
the reimbursement finally obtained, retroactive to the date of the accident.
B. Any additional premium owed as a result of the adjusted experience
modifier shall be amortized over a period of two calendar years, unless otherwise
agreed by the parties.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1252 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 605